Indiana, session 2026, SB263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-37 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]:
Chapter 37. Child and Dependent Care Tax Credit
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "adjusted gross income" has the
meaning set forth in IC 6-3-1-3.5.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "employment related
expenses" means amounts that are:
(1) paid for the care of a qualifying individual; and
(2) incurred to enable an individual taxpayer, including an
individual taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint return, to be
gainfully employed.
(b) The term does not include an amount paid for services
outside the taxpayer's household at a camp where a qualifying
individual stays overnight.
(c) The term does not include amounts paid for services outside
the taxpayer's household that are not provided in conformity with
2026 IN 263—LS 6681/DI 129


applicable state and local laws.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "federal poverty level" refers to
the poverty income guidelines published by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "qualifying individual" has the
meaning set forth in Section 21(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "state income tax liability"
means the total income tax liability incurred under IC 6-3, as
computed after application of the credits that under IC 6-3.1-1-2
are to be applied before the credit provided by this chapter.
Sec. 6. An individual taxpayer, including an individual
taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint return, who has:
(1) employment related expenses during the taxable year; and
(2) adjusted gross income, or combined adjusted gross income
with the taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint return, of not
more than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal
poverty level for the taxable year;
is entitled to a refundable credit against the taxpayer's state
income tax liability for the taxable year.
Sec. 7. The amount of a credit allowed under section 6 of this
chapter for a taxable year is equal to the following:
(1) The lesser of:
(A) the amount of employment related expenses incurred
in the taxable year multiplied by twenty percent (20%); or
(B) one thousand dollars ($1,000);
if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income, or combined adjusted
gross income with the taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint
return, is not more than one hundred eighty-five percent
(185%) of the federal poverty level.
(2) The lesser of:
(A) the amount of employment related expenses incurred
in the taxable year multiplied by twenty percent (20%); or
(B) eight hundred dollars ($800);
if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income, or combined adjusted
gross income with the taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint
return, is more than one hundred eighty-five percent (185%)
but not more than two hundred one percent (201%) of the
federal poverty level.
(3) The lesser of:
(A) the amount of employment related expenses incurred
in the taxable year multiplied by twenty percent (20%); or
(B) six hundred dollars ($600);
2026 IN 263—LS 6681/DI 129


if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income, or combined adjusted
gross income with the taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint
return, is more than two hundred one percent (201%) but not
more than two hundred seventeen percent (217%) of the
federal poverty level.
(4) The lesser of:
(A) the amount of employment related expenses incurred
in the taxable year multiplied by twenty percent (20%); or
(B) four hundred dollars ($400);
if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income, or combined adjusted
gross income with the taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint
return, is more than two hundred seventeen percent (217%)
but not more than two hundred thirty-three percent (233%)
of the federal poverty level.
(5) The lesser of:
(A) the amount of employment related expenses incurred
in the taxable year multiplied by twenty percent (20%); or
(B) two hundred dollars ($200);
if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income, or combined adjusted
gross income with the taxpayer's spouse in the case of a joint
return, is more than two hundred thirty-three percent (233%)
but not more than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the
federal poverty level.
Sec. 8. If both spouses reside in the same household, the total
amount of the credit computed under section 7 of this chapter may
be claimed only once.
Sec. 9. If the credit provided under this chapter exceeds the state
income tax liability due from the taxpayer for the taxable year, the
excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
Sec. 10. (a) The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
(b) The department may require that a taxpayer apply for a
credit under this chapter on a form designated by the department.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]
(a) IC 6-3.1-37, as added by this act, applies only to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2025.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 263—LS 6681/DI 129